New York, session 2025-2026, S10089.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The uniform justice court act is amended by adding a new 2 section 106-c to read as follows: 3 § 106-c. Residency of justices. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any 5 justice serving a term of office in a town, village or city court may 6 reside in any town, village or city contained in whole or in part within 7 the same assembly district as the court such justice serves. 8 § 2. The uniform justice court act is amended by adding a new section 9 105-a to read as follows: 10 § 105-a. Minimum educational requirements of certain town and village 11 justices. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any town 13 or village, may by a majority vote of the governing body of such town or 14 village, require that any person who serves as a town or village justice 15 be admitted to practice law in the state. Any change in the requirements 16 for eligibility to serve as town or village justice shall take effect 17 upon commencement of the next judicial term of office following the 18 election after enactment of the local law. 19 § 3. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 20 subdivision 10-a to read as follows: 21 10-a. Neither the provisions of this section nor of any general, 22 special or local law, charter, code, ordinance, resolution, rule or 23 regulation, requiring a person to be a resident of the political subdi- 24 vision or municipal corporation of the state for which they shall be 25 chosen or within which their official functions are required to be exer- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01318-03-5 S. 10089 2 1 cised, shall apply to the appointment of justices of a town or village 2 court who resides in an assembly district contiguous to such munici- 3 pality. 4 § 4. Section 2104 of the uniform city court act is amended by adding a 5 new subdivision (g) to read as follows: 6 (g) Neither the provisions of this section nor of any general, special 7 or local law, charter, code, ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation, 8 requiring a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or 9 municipal corporation of the state for which they shall be chosen or 10 within which their official functions are required to be exercised, 11 shall apply to the appointment of justices of a city court outside of 12 the city of New York who resides in an assembly district contiguous to 13 such municipality. 14 § 5. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 15 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.